North Carolina, session 2025, SB568.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, may establish the North
Carolina Mental Health and Psychedelic Medicine Task Force (Task Force). The purpose of this
Task Force is to:
(1) Assess the potential use of psychedelic medicine in addressing the State's
ongoing mental health crisis.
(2) Consider barriers to implementation and equitable access.
(3) Consider and recommend licensing and insurance requirements for
practitioners in the State in the event that psychedelic medicines are federally
reclassified and approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(4) Consider legal and regulatory pathways to the legalization of psychedelic
medicines in the State and the potential effects of the medicines on public
health.
SECTION 2. The Task Force shall consist of the following members:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, or the
Secretary's designee.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, or the
Secretary's designee.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Commerce, or the Secretary's designee.
(4) One member representing mental health issues in the State, selected by the
State chapter of a national alliance focused on mental health and mental
illness.
(5) One member representing health care needs of North Carolina Native
communities, selected by the tribal council of the Eastern Band of Cherokee
Indians.
(6) One member representing the health care needs of survivors of domestic
violence and sexual assault, selected by the NC Domestic Violence
Commission.
(7) One member representing the psychiatric profession, selected by the
governing body of the North Carolina Psychiatric Association.
*S568-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) One member of the faculty of the University of North Carolina School of
Medicine, selected by the dean of the University of North Carolina School of
Medicine.
(9) One member of the faculty of the East Carolina University Brody School of
Medicine, selected by the dean of the Brody School of Medicine.
(10) Two members of the Senate, one appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate and one appointed by the Senate Minority Leader.
(11) Two members of the House of Representatives, one appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives and one appointed by the House Minority
Leader.
(12) Up to three members selected by the Task Force, once assembled, that the
Task Force determines would serve the purpose of the Task Force, including,
but not limited to, members of veterans advocacy groups, disabled veterans
groups, first responders associations, anti-human trafficking advocacy
organizations, law enforcement advocacy organizations, and victims' rights
groups. The Task Force is not required to make an appointment under this
subdivision.
SECTION 3. The Task Force shall elect a chair from among its members.
SECTION 4. A vacancy on the Task Force shall be filled in the same manner as the
original selection or appointment.
SECTION 5. Members of the Task Force shall receive per diem, subsistence, and
travel allowance as provided in G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, and 138-6, as appropriate.
SECTION 6. The Task Force shall:
(1) Meet at least four times to fulfill the purpose of the Task Force.
(2) Ensure members are available for legislative hearings.
(3) Submit a final report on the results of its study, including any proposed
legislation, to the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. The Task Force shall terminate on December 31, 2026, or upon the
filing of its final report, whichever is later.
SECTION 8. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 568-First Edition